Washington statutes.
RCW 11.80.055

Continuation of absentee's business—Performance of absentee's contracts.

Upon a showing of advantage to the estate of the absentee, the court may authorize the trustee to continue any business of the absentee in accordance with the provisions of RCW 11.48.025. The trustee may also obtain an order allowing the performance of the absentee's contracts in accordance with the provisions of chapter 11.60 RCW.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.80.055.]